src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V-pittiissä_01
!+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>AÄ1%>n	#   ; ! oon
!+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>AÄ1%>t	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:jAÄ1AÄ1	K_V   ;
!+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>AÄ1%>mmAÄ1	#   ;
!+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>AÄ1%>ttAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:jAÄ1AÄ1t	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+4:%>ssAÄ1AÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:	#   ;
!
:i IndPrt_1-2 ;
!+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>%^WCnsin       #   ; ! oon
!+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>%^WCnsit       #   ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:s        K_V   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>%^WCnsi%>mmAÄ1     #   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>%^WCnsi%>ttAÄ1     #   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl3:i%>vAÄ1t     K_V   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>stii     K_V   ;
!+Ind+ConNeg+Prt:e%>%^WCnsttUY1         #   ;
! Fix 2012-10-04
!+Pot+Sg1:ä%>nen      #   ; ! oon
!+Pot+Sg2:ä%>net      #   ;
!+Pot+Sg3:ä%>nöö      #   ;
!+Pot+Pl1:ä%>nemmAÄ1    #   ;
!+Pot+Pl2:ä%>nettAÄ1    #   ;
!+Pot+Pl3:ä%>noot     #   ;
!+Pot+4:ollaa      #   ;
!+Pot+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
!
!+Cond+Sg1:%>jAÄ1isin      #   ; ! oon
!+Cond+Sg2:%>jAÄ1isit      #   ;
!+Cond+Sg3:%>jAÄ1is      #   ;
!+Cond+Pl1:%>jAÄ1isimmAÄ1    #   ;
!+Cond+Pl2:%>jAÄ1isittAÄ1    #   ;
! +Cond+Pl3:olisivat     #   ;
!+Cond+4:%>stAÄ1is      #   ;
! !+Cond+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
! +Imprt+Sg2:oo      #   ;
! +Imprt+Sg3:olkoo      #   ;
! +Imprt+Pl1:olkaa    #   ;
! +Imprt+Pl2:olkoot    #   ;
! !+Imprt+Pl3:olisivat     #   ; ! laa ovat
! +Imprt+4:oltakoo      #   ;
! !+Imprt+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
: V-actor_jA ; !
! +Prc:oleva			       #   ;!V-ActPrsPrc
:s V-ActPrtPrc_st ; !pittiist
!+Prc:e%>ttAÄ1%>vAÄ1	A-tulova   ;
! +Prc:oltu			       #   ;
! 
+Inf:ssAÄ1             #   ; ! pittiissä
!+Inf:ämAÄ1  SG-ILL_V   ; ! pittämää
! +Inf+Ine:olemaas      #   ;
! +Inf+Ela:olemast      #   ;
! +Inf+Abe:olemata      #   ;
! +Ger:ollees		#   ;
+Der/miin:mi N-inmihiin ; ! piittiimiin

!joossa:joo
LEXICON V-joossa
!+V:ks V-joossa_01 ;
+V:ksi IndPrt ;
+V:ksi V-actor_jA ; !

!LEXICON V-joossa_01

! vuhissa:vuhis
LEXICON V-vuhissa
+V: V-vuhissa_01 ;

LEXICON V-vuhissa_01
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:e%>%^WCnsn	#   ; ! oon
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:e%>%^WCnst	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:OÖ1%>%^LCnsV3	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:e%>%^WCnsmmAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:e%>%^WCnsttAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:OÖ1%>%^LCnsV3t	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+4:e%>%^WCnstAÄ1AÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:e%>%^WCns	#   ;

:%^TSi IndPrt ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^TSivAÄ1t     K_V   ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:e%>%^WCnstii     #   ;
+Ind+ConNeg+Prt:e%>%^WCnsttUY1         #   ;

:n PotPers ; ! vuhisnoo
!+Pot+4:ollaa      #   ;
!+Pot+ConNeg:oo                #   ;

 CondPers ; ! vuhisisin
! +Cond+4:oltais      #   ;
! !+Cond+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
: ImprtPers_k ; !vuhiskaa
! +Imprt+Sg2:oo      #   ;
! +Imprt+4:oltakoo      #   ;
! !+Imprt+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
:i V-actor_jA ; !
:e V-ActPrsPrc ; ! vuhiseva
:	V-ActPrtPrc_st   ; ! lukent
+Prc:e%>%^WCnsttAÄ1vAÄ1	A-tulova   ;
+PrtPrc:e%>%^WCnsttUY1	 	A-kova   ;
+V+Inf+Der/tOin:emAÄ1t A-kalatoin ; ! lukematoin
! 
+Inf:tAÄ1%>%^WCns             #   ; ! vuhissa
+Inf:OÖ1mAÄ1  SG-ILL_V   ; ! vuhisemmaa
+Inf:emAÄ1  SG-ILL_V   ; ! antamaa
+Inf:emAÄ1 SG-INE   ;
+Inf:emAÄ1 SG-ELA   ;
+Inf:emAÄ1 SG-ABE   ;
! +Ger:ollees		#   ;
+Der/miin:OÖ1%>mi N-inmihiin ;



! :laatihu
LEXICON V-laatihussa
!+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>AÄ1%>n	#   ; ! oon
!+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>AÄ1%>t	#   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>V3	K_V   ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>AÄ1%>mmAÄ1	#   ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>AÄ1%>ttAÄ1	#   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>V3t	K_V   ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+4:%>ssAÄ1AÄ1	#   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:	#   ;

!+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>%^WCnsin       #   ; ! oon
!+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>%^WCnsit       #   ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:i        K_V   ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>%^WCnsi%>mmAÄ1     #   ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>%^WCnsi%>ttAÄ1     #   ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:it     K_V   ;
+Dial/Lauk+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:i%>vAÄ1t     K_V   ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>stii     #   ;
!+V+Ind+ConNeg+Prt:e%>%^WCnsttUY1         #   ;
!
!+V+Pot+Sg1:ä%>nen      #   ; ! oon
!+V+Pot+Sg2:ä%>net      #   ;
!+V+Pot+Sg3:ä%>nöö      #   ;
!+V+Pot+Pl1:ä%>nemmAÄ1    #   ;
!+V+Pot+Pl2:ä%>nettAÄ1    #   ;
!+V+Pot+Pl3:ä%>noot     #   ;
!+V+Pot+4:ollaa      #   ;
!+V+Pot+ConNeg:oo                #   ;

!+V+Cond+Sg1:%>jAÄ1isin      #   ; ! oon
!+V+Cond+Sg2:%>jAÄ1isit      #   ;
+V+Cond+Sg3:%>is      #   ;
!+V+Cond+Pl1:%>jAÄ1isimmAÄ1    #   ;
!+V+Cond+Pl2:%>jAÄ1isittAÄ1    #   ;
! +V+Cond+Pl3:olisivat     #   ;
!+V+Cond+4:%>stAÄ1is      #   ;
! !+V+Cond+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
! +V+Imprt+Sg2:oo      #   ;
! +V+Imprt+Sg3:olkoo      #   ;
! +V+Imprt+Pl1:olkaa    #   ;
! +V+Imprt+Pl2:olkoot    #   ;
! !+V+Imprt+Pl3:olisivat     #   ; ! laa ovat
! +V+Imprt+4:oltakoo      #   ;
! !+V+Imprt+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
! +V+Prc:oleva			       #   ;! V-ActPrsPrc
+V: V-ActPrtPrc_nt ; ! laatihunt, tekahunt
!+V+Prc:e%>ttAÄ1%>vAÄ1	A-tulova   ;
! +V+Prc:oltu			       #   ;
+V+Inf+Der/tOin:mAÄ1t A-kalatoin ; ! laatihumatoin
! 
+V+Inf:ss%>AÄ1             #   ; ! pittää
+V+Inf:ämAÄ1  SG-ILL_V   ; ! pittämää
! +V+Inf+Ine:olemaas      #   ;
! +V+Inf+Ela:olemast      #   ;
! +V+Inf+Abe:olemata      #   ;
! +V+Ger:ollees		#   ;
+V+Der/miin:mi%>%^LCns N-inmihiin ;

LEXICON V-määrätä
   V-arvata  ;

LEXICON V-upota
   V-arvata  ;
+V+Der/miin:%>%^LCnsOÖ1mi N-inmihiin ;


! (??)
LEXICON V-arvata
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>%^LCnsAÄ1n	#   ; ! oon
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>%^LCnsAÄ1t	#   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>jAÄ1AÄ1	K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>%^LCnsAÄ1mmAÄ1	#   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>%^LCnsAÄ1ttAÄ1	#   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>jAÄ1AÄ1t	K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+4:%>%^WCnstAÄ1AÄ1	#   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>AÄ1 	#   ;

+V:si IndPrt ;
+Dial/Soik+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>siit     K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>%^WCnsttii     K_V   ;
+V+Ind+ConNeg+Prt:%>%^WCnsttUY1         #   ;

+V:n PotPers ; !arvannoo
!+V+Pot+4:ttAÄ1nOÖ1OÖ1      #   ;
!+V+Pot+ConNeg:oo                #   ;

+V: CondPers  ; ! arvaisimma
+V+Cond+4:%>%^WCnsttAÄ1is      #   ;
! !+V+Cond+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
+V:t ImprtPers_k ;
! +V+Imprt+Sg2:oo      #   ;
+V+Imprt+4:%>%^WCnstkOÖ1OÖ1    K_V   ;
! !+V+Imprt+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
+V:%>%^LCnsAÄ1 V-actor_jA ; !2012-10-30
+V:%>%^LCnsAÄ1 V-ActPrsPrc ; ! arvaava
+V:%>%^WCns%^OddSyll V-ActPrtPrc_nt ; !arvant arvanneet
+V+Prc:%>%^WCnsttAÄ1vAÄ1	A-tulova   ;
+V+PrtPrc:%>%^WCnsttUY1		A-kova   ;
! 
+V+Inf:%>%^WCnstAÄ1             #   ; ! läätää
+V+Inf:%>%^LCnsAÄ1mAÄ1  SG-ILL_V  ; ! arvaamaa
+V+Inf+Der/tOin:%>%^LCnsAÄ1mAÄ1t A-kalatoin ; ! arvaamaton
+V+Inf:AÄ1mAÄ1 SG-INE   ;
+V+Inf:AÄ1mAÄ1 SG-ELA   ;
+V+Inf:AÄ1mAÄ1 SG-ABE   ;
+V+Ger:%>%^WCnsjees		#   ;
+V+Der/miin:%>%^LCnsAÄ1mi N-inmihiin ;

! hävitä:hävi (??)
LEXICON V-hävitä
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:j%>AÄ1%^WCnsn	#   ; ! oon
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:j%>AÄ1%^WCnst	#   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:j%>AÄ1%>AÄ1	K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:ijAÄ1AÄ1	K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:jAÄ1AÄ1	K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:j%>AÄ1%^WCnsmmAÄ1	#   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:j%>AÄ1%^WCnsttAÄ1	#   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:j%>AÄ1%^LVwst	K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+4:%>%^WCnstAÄ1%>AÄ1	#   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:j%>AÄ1 	#   ;

+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>sin       #   ; ! oon
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>sit       #   ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:s       K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:si%>mmAÄ1     #   ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:si%>ttAÄ1     #   ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:si%>vAÄ1t     K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>ttii     K_V   ;
!+V+Ind+ConNeg+Prt:%>%^WCnsttUY1         #   ;

+V:n PotPers ; ! hävinnöö
!+V+Pot+4:ttAÄ1nOÖ1OÖ1      #   ;
!+V+Pot+ConNeg:oo                #   ;

! +V+Cond+Sg1:olisin      #   ; ! oon
! +V+Cond+Sg2:olisit      #   ;
! +V+Cond+Sg3:olis      #   ;
! +V+Cond+Pl1:olisimma    #   ;
! +V+Cond+Pl2:olisitta    #   ;
! +V+Cond+Pl3:olisivat     #   ;
+V+Cond+4:ttAÄ1is      #   ;
! !+V+Cond+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
+V:t ImprtPers_k ;
! +V+Imprt+Sg2:oo      #   ;
+V+Imprt+4:tkOÖ1OÖ1    K_V   ;
! !+V+Imprt+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
+V:i V-actor_jA ; !
! +V+Prc:oleva			       #   ;!V-ActPrsPrc
+V:         V-ActPrtPrc_nt	   ; !hävint
+V+Prc:ttAÄ1%>vAÄ1		A-tulova   ;
+V+PrtPrc:%>ttUY1		A-kova   ;
! 
+V+Inf:%>tAÄ1             #   ; ! hävitä
+V+Inf:mAÄ1  SG-ILL_V   ; ! antamaa
! +V+Inf+Ine:olemaas      #   ;
! +V+Inf+Ela:olemast      #   ;
! +V+Inf+Abe:olemata      #   ;
! +V+Ger:ollees		#   ;
+V+Der/miin:%>%^LCns%^LVwsmi N-inmihiin ;
