src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
hävitä:hävi V-hävitä  "" ;
vuhissa:vuhis V-vuhissa  "" ;
joossa:joo V-joossa  "" ;
laatihussa:laatihu V-laatihussa  "" ;
oppihussa:oppihu V-laatihussa  "" ;
tekahussa:tekahu V-laatihussa  "" ;
jakahussa:jakahu V-laatihussa  "" ;
arvata:arva V-arvata  "" ;
kraasata:kraasa V-arvata  "" ;
maata:maka V-arvata  "" ;
seilata:seila V-arvata  "" ;
duumata:duuma V-arvata  "" ;
reknata:rekna V-arvata  "" ;
mitata:mitta V-arvata  "" ;
lakata:lakka V-arvata  "" ;
korjata:korja V-arvata  "" ;
lisätä:lisä V-arvata  "" ;
tervata:terva V-arvata  "" ;
upota:uppo V-upota  "" ;
erota:ero V-upota  "" ;
tuumata:tuuma V-arvata  "" ;
leikata:leikka V-arvata  "" ;
sahata:saha V-arvata  "" ;
salvata:salpa V-arvata  "" ;
kelvata:kelpa V-arvata  "" ;
kirjata:kirja V-arvata  "" ;
virrata:virta V-arvata  "" ;
avata:ava V-arvata  "" ;
salvata:salva V-arvata  "" ;
proovata:proova V-arvata  "" ;
vastata:vasta V-arvata  "" ;
läätä:läkä V-arvata  "" ;
määrätä:määrä V-määrätä  "" ;
